Hawaii statutes.
§706-606.4 Sentencing in enumerated
offenses committed in the presence of a minor. (1) In addition to the
factors considered under section 706-606, the court shall consider the
following aggravating factors in determining the particular sentence to be imposed:

(a) The defendant has been convicted of committing
or attempting to commit an offense; and

(b) The offense contemporaneously occurred in the
presence of a minor.

(2) As used in this section:

"In the presence of a minor" means in
the actual physical presence of a child or knowing that a child is present and
may hear or see the offense.

"Offense" means a violation of
section 707-710 (assault in the first degree), 707-711 (assault in the second
degree), 707-730 (sexual assault in the first degree), 707-731 (sexual assault
in the second degree), 707-732 (sexual assault in the third degree), or 709-906
(abuse of family or household members). [L 1999, c 268, §2; am L 2003, c 3, §16;
am L 2016, c 157, §1]

COMMENTARY ON §706-606.4

Act 268, Session Laws 1999, added this section to require
judges, when imposing a sentence, to consider the fact that the crime was
committed in the presence of a minor as an aggravating factor of the crime; the
court shall consider the aggravating factors in addition to the factors to be
considered under §706-606. The legislature found that children who witness
domestic violence are harmed in many ways, and acknowledged that domestic
violence is a perpetuation of a violent cycle, as children of abuse grow up to
be abusers themselves. Studies have documented multiple problems among
children that have witnessed continual assaults by one parent on another in the
home, including psychological and emotional distress, cognitive functioning
problems, and physical problems. Because of the high social and financial
costs resulting from domestic violence, the legislature agreed that more
serious penalties should be imposed for both their deterrent and punitive
effects. Conference Committee Report No. 26.

Act 3, Session Laws 2003, made a technical amendment to this
section, by deleting the brackets around the word "or" in the phrase
"abuse of family or household members."

Act 157, Session Laws 2016, amended this section to provide
that the commission of certain offenses of assault, sexual assault, and abuse
of a family or household member in the presence of a minor is an aggravating
factor to be considered in the sentencing of the defendant convicted of the
offense. The legislature found that research has shown that children who
witness assault or domestic violence can suffer severe emotional and
developmental difficulties that are similar to those of children who are
victims of direct physical and mental abuse. By broadening the application of
the aggravating factor considered by the courts when sentencing defendants
convicted of committing certain crimes in the presence of a minor pursuant to
this section to include the commission of assault and sexual assault offenses
regardless of the preexisting legal relationship between the defendant and the
victim or the child, Act 157 recognized the impact that witnessing an assault
has on a child. The use of the aggravating factor for sentencing does not
elevate the seriousness of the offense charged. Conference Committee Report
No. 13-16.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next